Wyoming, session 2026, HB0189.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-25-117 is created to read:

22-25-117. Regulation by homeowners associations of
display of campaign signs.

(a) As used in this section, "homeowners association"
means any incorporated or unincorporated association that
HB0189

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0464
is owned by or whose members consist primarily of the
owners of property governed by an enforceable legal
document through which the owners, or the board of
directors or similar governing body, manage or regulate a
residential subdivision, planned unit development,
condominium or townhouse development, cooperative, mobile
home association, nonprofit land trust or similar planned
residential development.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by this section, no
homeowners association shall prohibit the indoor or outdoor
display of a political campaign sign, including any sign or
flag advertising a candidate for nomination or election to
public office or for any ballot proposition.

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a
homeowners association in accordance with the homeowners
association's bylaws or other governing document from
establishing regulations that prohibit:

(i) Political campaign signs posted outdoors
unless they are ground-mounted or attached to a fence on
the homeowners association member's property;
HB0189

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0464

(ii) A property owner from displaying more than
one (1) sign for each candidate or ballot proposition;

(iii) The display of political campaign signs
before the candidate files for candidacy for an elected
office in the primary election;

(iv) The display of political campaign signs
more than thirty (30) days after the date of the general
election;

(v) The attachment of political signs in any way
to plants, traffic control devices, streetlights, trailers
or vehicles;

(vi) The painting of architectural surfaces;

(vii) Political campaign signs that threaten
public health or safety;

(viii) Political campaign signs that are larger
than four (4) feet by six (6) feet;
HB0189

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0464

(ix) Political campaign signs that violate a
law;

(x) Political campaign signs that contain
language, graphics or any display that would be obscene
pursuant to W.S. 6-4-301(a)(iii); or

(xi) Political campaign signs that are
accompanied by music or other sounds, streamers, flags,
inflatables or that may otherwise cause distraction to
motorists.

(d) A homeowners association in accordance with the
association's bylaws or governing document may request
removal of any political campaign sign that is displayed in
violation of a regulation allowed by this section.

Section 2. This act shall apply to homeowners
associations that are newly created or whose by-laws are
created or amended to impose restrictions on political
signage on or after July 1, 2026.

HB0189

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0464
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0189